Illinois, session 104th, HB5233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 50-10, 50-75, and 60-35 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 9used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 10Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:11    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 12courses at a college, university, or approved school, 13customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 14the calendar year.15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit.19    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 20person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 21nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 22(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 23clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the   HB5233- 2 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1Department. All advanced practice registered nurses licensed 2and practicing in the State of Illinois shall use the title 3APRN and may use specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS 4after their name. All advanced practice registered nurses may 5only practice in accordance with national certification and 6this Act. 7    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 8Center Advisory Board.9    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 10"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 11of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 12by the Department under the provisions of this Act.13    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 14Secretary.15    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.16    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health 17care professionals working together, each contributing one's 18respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 19patient care.20    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 21performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 22judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 23expectations for nursing practice. 24    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 25information about the patient's physiological, psychological, 26sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a   HB5233- 3 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1registered professional nurse and is the first step in 2implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 3    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 4practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 5another health care professional.6    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 7validating the qualifications of a health care professional.8    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 9under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation.12    "Email address of record" means the designated email 13address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 14application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 15by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.16    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 17individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 18comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 19professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or 20the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 21podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 22professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 23ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 24of the information and when to inform. 25    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an 26advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and   HB5233- 4 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 2or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 3agreement and: 4        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 5    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 6        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 7    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 8    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 9    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority 10    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 11    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 12    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 13    by the needs of the patient; and 14        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 15    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 16    provided in Section 65-43. 17    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 18registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 19licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner, 20clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 21notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 22continuing education or training in the advanced practice 23registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 24hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 25certification and who has submitted an application to the 26Department to be granted full practice authority.   HB5233- 5 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 2joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 3organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 4to the provision, management, or support of health care 5services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 6controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 7the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 8least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 9A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any 10combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 11physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 12in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 13maintenance organization regulated under the Health 14Maintenance Organization Act. 15    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 16is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 17of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 18determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 19including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a 20psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 21her ability to deliver competent patient care.22    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 23a registered professional nurse who has completed all 24requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 25nurse except the certification examination and has applied to 26take the next available certification exam and received a   HB5233- 6 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1temporary permit from the Department.2    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 3passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 4and has applied for a license from the Department. A 5license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 6pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.7    "Maternity care desert" means a county without any 8hospital, any birth center, or any licensed health care 9professional offering obstetric care. 10    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 11clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 12An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 13professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 14registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 15to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 16other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 17intervention based on patient safety. 18    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 19in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.20    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 21podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 22    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 23person who is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act and 24practices practical nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 25practical nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use the 26title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation   HB5233- 7 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1"L.P.N.".2    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 3interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and 4skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 5nursing education program. Practical nursing includes 6assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 7registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 8registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 9direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 10physician, or other health care professional determined by the 11Department.12    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 13governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 14organization to provide specific patient care services within 15well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 16credentialing process. 17    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 18means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse under 19this Act and practices nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 20registered nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use 21the titles "registered nurse" and "registered professional 22nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".23    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 24scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge 25that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 26promotion, and optimization of health and abilities,   HB5233- 8 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1prevention of illness and injury, development and 2implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 3nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care 4coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 5families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 6professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 7medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 8corrective measures. Registered professional nursing practice 9is a scientific process founded on a professional body of 10knowledge. It is a learned profession based on the 11understanding of the human condition across the life span and 12environment, includes all nursing specialties, and means the 13performance of any nursing act based upon professional 14knowledge, judgment, and skills acquired by means of 15completion of an approved professional nursing education 16program. A registered professional nurse provides holistic 17nursing care through the nursing process to individuals, 18groups, families, or communities, that includes, but is not 19limited to: (i) the assessment of healthcare needs, nursing 20diagnosis, planning, implementation, and nursing evaluation; 21(ii) the promotion, maintenance, and restoration of health; 22(iii) counseling, patient education, health education, and 23patient advocacy; (iv) the administration of medications and 24treatments as prescribed by a physician licensed to practice 25medicine in all of its branches, a licensed dentist, a 26licensed podiatric physician, or a licensed optometrist or as   HB5233- 9 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1prescribed by a physician assistant or by an advanced practice 2registered nurse; (v) the coordination and management of the 3nursing plan of care; (vi) the delegation to and supervision 4of individuals who assist the registered professional nurse 5implementing the plan of care; and (vii) teaching nursing 6students. 7    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 8professional assistance program that meets criteria 9established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 10Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 11approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 12practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 13addiction.14    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 15Professional Regulation.16    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 17standing.18    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 19agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 20collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 21pursuant to Section 65-35. 22(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25; 23104-244, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (225 ILCS 65/50-75)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)  HB5233- 10 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1    Sec. 50-75. Nursing delegation by a registered 2professional nurse.3    (a) For the purposes of this Section:4    "Delegation" means transferring to a specific individual 5the authority to perform a specific nursing intervention or 6task in a specific situation.7    "Predictability of outcomes" means that a registered 8professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse has 9determined that the patient's or individual's clinical status 10is stable and expected to improve or the patient's or 11individual's deteriorating condition is expected to follow a 12known or expected course. 13    "Stability" means a registered professional nurse or 14advanced practice registered nurse has determined that the 15individual's clinical status and nursing care needs are 16consistent. 17    "Task" means work not requiring nursing knowledge, 18judgment, or decision-making, as defined by the Department by 19rule. 20    (b) This Section authorizes a registered professional 21nurse to:22        (1) delegate nursing interventions and tasks to other 23    registered professional nurses and , licensed practical 24    nurses based on the comprehensive nursing assessment that 25    includes, but is not limited to:26            (A) the stability and condition of the patient;  HB5233- 11 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1            (B) the potential for harm;2            (C) the complexity of the nursing intervention or 3        task to be delegated;4            (D) the predictability of outcomes; and5            (E) the competency of the individual to whom the 6        nursing intervention or task is delegated; 7        (2) delegate tasks to , and other unlicensed personnel 8    based on the comprehensive nursing assessment that 9    includes, but is not limited to:10            (A) the stability and condition of the patient;11            (B) the potential for harm;12            (C) the complexity of the task nursing 13        intervention to be delegated;14            (D) the predictability of outcomes; and15            (E) competency of the individual to whom the task 16        nursing intervention is delegated;17        (3) (2) delegate medication administration to other 18    licensed nurses; or 19        (3) in community-based or in-home care settings, 20    delegate the administration of medication (limited to oral 21    or subcutaneous dosage and topical or transdermal 22    application) to unlicensed personnel, if all the 23    conditions for delegation set forth in this Section are 24    met; 25        (4) refuse to delegate, stop, or rescind a previously 26    authorized delegation. ; or  HB5233- 12 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1        (5) in community-based or in-home care settings, 2    delegate, guide, and evaluate the implementation of 3    nursing interventions as a component of patient care 4    coordination after completion of the comprehensive patient 5    assessment based on analysis of the comprehensive nursing 6    assessment data; care coordination in in-home care and 7    school settings may occur in person, by telecommunication, 8    or by electronic communication. 9    (c) This Section prohibits the following:10        (1) An individual or entity from mandating that a 11    registered professional nurse delegate nursing 12    interventions if the registered professional nurse 13    determines it is inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not 14    be subject to disciplinary or any other adverse action for 15    refusing to delegate a nursing intervention based on 16    patient safety.17        (2) The delegation of medication administration to 18    unlicensed personnel in any institutional or long-term 19    facility, including, but not limited to, those facilities 20    licensed by the Hospital Licensing Act, the University of 21    Illinois Hospital Act, State-operated mental health 22    hospitals, or State-operated developmental centers, except 23    as authorized under Article 80 of this Act or otherwise 24    specifically authorized by law.25        (2.5) A registered professional nurse from delegating 26    work requiring nursing knowledge, assessment, judgment,   HB5233- 13 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1    inference, and decision-making (including medication 2    administration), the development of a plan of care, and 3    the evaluation of a plan of care to unlicensed non-nurse 4    personnel. 5        (3) A registered professional nurse from delegating 6    nursing judgment, the comprehensive patient assessment, 7    the development of a plan of care, and the evaluation of 8    care to licensed or unlicensed personnel.9        (4) A licensed practical nurse or unlicensed personnel 10    who has been delegated a nursing intervention or task from 11    re-delegating a nursing intervention or task.12        (5) Unlicensed personnel who have been delegated tasks 13    from re-delegating the tasks.14    (d) A registered professional nurse may delegate tasks to 15other licensed and unlicensed persons.16(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-1160, eff. 6-1-19.) 17    (225 ILCS 65/60-35)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)19    Sec. 60-35. RN scope of practice. The RN scope of nursing 20practice is the protection, promotion, and optimization of 21health and abilities, the prevention of illness and injury, 22the development and implementation of the nursing plan of 23care, the facilitation of nursing interventions to alleviate 24suffering, care coordination, and advocacy in the care of 25individuals, families, groups, communities, and populations.   HB5233- 14 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1Practice as a registered professional nurse means this full 2scope of nursing, with or without compensation, that 3incorporates caring for all patients in all settings, through 4nursing standards of practice and professional performance for 5coordination of care, and may include, but is not limited to, 6all of the following: 7        (1) Collecting pertinent data and information relative 8    to the patient's health or the situation on an ongoing 9    basis through the comprehensive nursing assessment.10        (2) Analyzing comprehensive nursing assessment data to 11    determine actual or potential diagnoses, problems, and 12    issues.13        (3) Identifying expected outcomes for a plan 14    individualized to the patient or the situation that 15    prescribes strategies to attain expected, measurable 16    outcomes.17        (4) Implementing the identified plan, coordinating 18    care delivery, employing strategies to promote healthy and 19    safe environments, and administering or delegating 20    medication administration according to Section 50-75 of 21    this Act.22        (5) Evaluating patient progress toward attainment of 23    goals and outcomes.24        (6) Delegating nursing interventions and tasks to 25    licensed nurses to implement the plan of care.26        (6.5) Delegating tasks to unlicensed personnel to   HB5233- 15 -LRB104 19833 AAS 33283 b1    implement the plan of care. 2        (7) Providing health education and counseling.3        (7.5) Advocating for the patient. 4        (8) Practicing ethically according to the American 5    Nurses Association Code of Ethics.6        (9) Practicing in a manner that recognizes cultural 7    diversity.8        (10) Communicating effectively in all areas of 9    practice.10        (11) Collaborating with patients and other key 11    stakeholders in the conduct of nursing practice.12        (12) Participating in continuous professional 13    development.14        (13) Teaching the theory and practice of nursing to 15    student nurses.16        (14) Leading within the professional practice setting 17    and the profession.18        (15) Contributing to quality nursing practice.19        (16) Integrating evidence and research findings into 20    practice.21        (17) Utilizing appropriate resources to plan, provide, 22    and sustain evidence-based nursing services that are safe 23    and effective.24(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.